Washington statutes.
RCW 18.59.125

Board—Compensation—Travel expenses.

Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.265. Members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the actual performance of their duties, as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The board is designated as a class five group for purposes of chapter 43.03 RCW.

[ 2022 c 240 s 18.]